Illinois, session 104th, SB2426.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources 5(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois is amended by changing Section 805-540 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 805/805-540)  (was 20 ILCS 805/63b2.6)8    Sec. 805-540. Enforcement of adjoining state's laws. The 9Director may grant authority to the officers of any adjoining 10state who are authorized and directed to enforce the laws of 11that state relating to the protection of flora and fauna to 12take any of the following actions and have the following 13powers within the State of Illinois: 14        (1) To follow, seize, and return to the adjoining 15    state any flora or fauna or part thereof shipped or taken 16    from the adjoining state in violation of the laws of that 17    state and brought into this State. 18        (2) To dispose of any such flora or fauna or part 19    thereof under the supervision of an Illinois Conservation 20    Police Officer. 21        (3) To enforce as an agent of this State, with the same 22    powers as an Illinois Conservation Police Officer, each of 23    the following laws of this State:   SB2426 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1            (i) The Illinois Endangered Species Protection 2        Act. 3            (ii) The Fish and Aquatic Life Code. 4            (iii) The Wildlife Code. 5            (iv) The Wildlife Habitat Management Areas Act. 6            (v) Section 48-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 7        (hunter or fisherman interference). 8            (vi) The Illinois Non-Game Wildlife Protection 9        Act. 10            (vii) The Ginseng Harvesting Act. 11            (viii) The State Forest Act. 12            (ix) The Timber Transportation Act Forest Products 13        Transportation Act. 14            (x) The Timber Buyers Licensing Act.15    Any officer of an adjoining state acting under a power or 16authority granted by the Director pursuant to this Section 17shall act without compensation or other benefits from this 18State and without this State having any liability for the acts 19or omissions of that officer.20(Source: P.A. 96-397, eff. 1-1-10; 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13; 2197-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 22    Section 10. The Forest Products Transportation Act is 23amended by changing Sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 13, and 14 and by 24adding Sections 6.5 and 6.8 as follows:   SB2426 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1    (225 ILCS 740/1)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6901)2    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 3Timber Transportation Act "Forest Products Transportation 4Act".5(Source: P.A. 77-2801.) 6    (225 ILCS 740/2)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6902)7    Sec. 2. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 8requires: , the terms defined in the Sections following this 9Section and preceding Section 3 have the meanings ascribed to 10them in those Sections.11    "Christmas tree" means a coniferous evergreen species of 12tree, such as spruce, pine, or fir, that is intended to be used 13solely for holiday decoration.14    "Commercial tree care business" means a business working 15in this State that is hired by a property owner, governmental 16agency, or utility for the purpose of providing tree care 17services, including pruning and tree removal.18    "Firewood" means any tree or part thereof which is 19harvested, is to be used solely for fuel, and is cut into 20lengths not exceeding 48 inches.21    "Person" means any person, partnership, firm, association, 22limited liability company, business, trust, or corporation.23    "Proof of ownership" means a printed document provided by 24the Department that serves as a written bill of sale, a bill of 25lading, a work order or signed sales contract associated with   SB2426 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1a commercial tree care business, an executed tree removal 2permit, or any other document or method of showing legal 3possession of timber that is approved by the Department in 4administrative rule, including digital copies.5    "Timber" means trees and parts thereof which can be used 6for sawing or processing into lumber for building or 7structural purposes or for the manufacture of any article. 8"Timber" does not include firewood, Christmas trees, fruit or 9ornamental trees, or wood products not used or to be used for 10building, structural, manufacturing, or processing purposes.11    "Tree" or "trees" means a woody perennial plant, typically 12having a single stem or trunk, growing to a height and bearing 13lateral branches at some distance from the ground.14(Source: P.A. 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 15    (225 ILCS 740/3)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6910)16    Sec. 3. Nothing in this Act affects the rights of the 17owners of trees or forest products nor imposes any duties or 18liabilities on them not otherwise imposed by law. This Act is, 19rather, intended to protect the rights of the owners of trees, 20identify the transportation of stolen timber, and protect the 21and forest products as well as the interests of the public 22interest in trees and forest products on public lands.23(Source: P.A. 77-2801.) 24    (225 ILCS 740/6)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6913)  SB2426 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1    Sec. 6. Any person hauling or transporting timber that is 2subject to the Timber Buyers Licensing Act 2 or more trees and 3forest products, or either of them, on any highway in this 4State shall be required to show proof of ownership as defined 5in Section 2.06 of this Act, except that interstate 6transporters originating outside of this State and traveling 7to destinations within or outside of this State may show 8documents in accordance with federal Motor Carrier Safety 9Administration rules in lieu of such proof of ownership.10    If any that person who is subject to this Act is unable to 11show proof of ownership, the timber and forest products so 12hauled or transported, and the vehicle or conveyance used as 13the means of transportation may be held by the Department for 14disposition subject to court order. The information required 15for proof of ownership shall be set by the Department by 16administrative rule. 17(Source: P.A. 92-805, eff. 8-21-02.) 18    (225 ILCS 740/6.5 new)19    Sec. 6.5. Inspection. The Department or any law 20enforcement agency may inspect any vehicle or conveyance 21hauling or transporting timber on any road or highway in this 22State to determine if the transportation of the timber 23complies with this Act. If an officer of the Department or law 24enforcement agency discovers any violation of this Act, the 25officer may issue a summons to the person operating the   SB2426 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1vehicle that is hauling or transporting the timber that 2requires that the person appears before the circuit court for 3the county within which the offense was committed. 4    (225 ILCS 740/6.8 new)5    Sec. 6.8. Violations.6    (a) A person's proof of ownership shall be available for 7inspection at all times and shall be kept with the person's 8vehicle or other conveyance load.9    (b) No person shall willfully fail or refuse to comply 10with any lawful order or direction of any officer authorized 11by law to enforce this Act.12    (c) No person shall knowingly falsify any information 13required on any proof of ownership or provide false 14information to any person that results in false information 15being provided on any proof of ownership. 16    (225 ILCS 740/13)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6920)17    Sec. 13. It shall be unlawful for any person to resist or 18obstruct any officer, employee or agent of the Department in 19the discharge of his duties under the provisions of this Act.20    Violations Violation of this Act or any administrative 21rules adopted under this Act Section shall be a Class C Class A 22misdemeanor.23(Source: P.A. 85-294.)   SB2426 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1    (225 ILCS 740/14)2    Sec. 14. Any timber, forestry, or wood cutting device or 3equipment, including vehicles and conveyances used or operated 4in violation of this Act or rules adopted under this Act or 5attempted to be used in violation of this Act or rules adopted 6under this Act shall be deemed a public nuisance and subject to 7seizure and confiscation by any authorized employee of the 8Department. Upon the seizure of such an item the Department 9shall take and hold the item until disposed of as provided in 10this Section.11    Upon the seizure of any property pursuant to this Section, 12the authorized employee of the Department making the seizure 13shall forthwith cause a complaint to be filed before the 14circuit court and a summons to be issued requiring the person 15who illegally used or operated or attempted to use or operate 16the property and the owner and person in possession of the 17property to appear in court and show cause why the seized 18property should not be forfeited to the State. Upon the return 19of the summons duly served or other notice as provided in this 20Section, the court shall proceed to determine the question of 21the illegality of the use of the seized property and upon 22judgment being entered to the effect that the property was 23illegally used, an order may be entered providing for the 24forfeiture of the seized property to the Department, which 25shall thereupon become the property of the Department. 26However, the owner of the property may have a jury determine   SB2426 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1the illegality of its use and shall have the right of an appeal 2as in other cases. Such a confiscation or forfeiture shall not 3preclude or mitigate against prosecution and assessment of 4penalties otherwise provided in this Act.5    Upon seizure of any property under circumstances 6supporting a reasonable belief that the property was 7abandoned, lost, stolen, or otherwise illegally possessed or 8used contrary to the provisions of this Act, except property 9seized during a search or arrest and ultimately returned, 10destroyed, or otherwise disposed of pursuant to a court order 11in accordance with this Act, the authorized employee of the 12Department shall make reasonable inquiry and efforts to 13identify and notify the owner or other person entitled to 14possession thereof and shall return the property after that 15person provides reasonable and satisfactory proof of his or 16her ownership or right to possession and reimburses the 17Department for all reasonable expenses of such custody. If the 18identity or location of the owner or other person entitled to 19possession of the property has not been ascertained within 6 20months after the Department obtains possession, the Department 21shall effectuate the sale of the property for cash to the 22highest bidder at a public auction. The owner or other person 23entitled to possession of the property may claim and recover 24possession of the property at any time before its sale at 25public auction upon providing reasonable and satisfactory 26proof of ownership or right of possession and after   SB2426 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1reimbursing the Department for all reasonable expenses of 2custody thereof.3    Any property forfeited to the State by court order 4pursuant to this Section may be disposed of by public auction, 5except that any property that is the subject of such a court 6order shall not be disposed of pending appeal of the order. The 7proceeds of the sale at auction shall be deposited in the 8Illinois Forestry Development Fund.9    The Department shall pay all costs of notices required by 10this Section.11(Source: P.A. 92-805, eff. 8-21-02.) 12    (225 ILCS 740/2.02 rep.)13    (225 ILCS 740/2.03 rep.)14    (225 ILCS 740/2.04 rep.)15    (225 ILCS 740/2.05 rep.)16    (225 ILCS 740/2.06 rep.)17    (225 ILCS 740/2.07 rep.)18    (225 ILCS 740/5 rep.)19    Section 15. The Forest Products Transportation Act is 20amended by repealing Sections 2.02, 2.03, 2.04, 2.05, 2.06, 212.07, and 5. 22    Section 20. The Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act is 23amended by changing Section 1-5 as follows:   SB2426 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1    (705 ILCS 135/1-5)2    Sec. 1-5. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Assessment" means any costs imposed on a defendant under 4schedules 1 through 13 of this Act.5    "Business offense" means any offense punishable by a fine 6in excess of $1,000 and for which a sentence of imprisonment is 7not an authorized disposition.8    "Case" means all charges and counts filed against a single 9defendant which are being prosecuted as a single proceeding 10before the court.11    "Count" means each separate offense charged in the same 12indictment, information, or complaint when the indictment, 13information, or complaint alleges the commission of more than 14one offense.15    "Conservation offense" means any violation of the 16following Acts, Codes, or ordinances, except any offense 17punishable upon conviction by imprisonment in the 18penitentiary:19        (1) Fish and Aquatic Life Code;20        (2) Wildlife Code;21        (3) Boat Registration and Safety Act;22        (4) Park District Code;23        (5) Chicago Park District Act;24        (6) State Parks Act;25        (7) State Forest Act;26        (8) Forest Fire Protection District Act;  SB2426 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1        (9) Snowmobile Registration and Safety Act;2        (10) Endangered Species Protection Act;3        (11) Timber Transportation Act Forest Products 4    Transportation Act;5        (12) Timber Buyers Licensing Act;6        (13) Downstate Forest Preserve District Act;7        (14) Illinois Exotic Weeds Act;8        (15) Ginseng Harvesting Act;9        (16) Cave Protection Act;10        (17) ordinances adopted under the Counties Code for 11    the acquisition of property for parks or recreational 12    areas;13        (18) Recreational Trails of Illinois Act;14        (19) Herptiles-Herps Act; or15        (20) any rule, regulation, proclamation, or ordinance 16    adopted under any Code or Act named in paragraphs (1) 17    through (19) of this definition.18    "Conviction" means a judgment of conviction or sentence 19entered upon a plea of guilty or upon a verdict or finding of 20guilty of an offense, rendered by a legally constituted jury 21or by a court of competent jurisdiction authorized to try the 22case without a jury.23    "Drug offense" means any violation of the Cannabis Control 24Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 25Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, or any 26similar local ordinance which involves the possession or   SB2426 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1delivery of a drug. 2    "Drug-related emergency response" means the act of 3collecting evidence from or securing a site where controlled 4substances were manufactured, or where by-products from the 5manufacture of controlled substances are present, and cleaning 6up the site, whether these actions are performed by public 7entities or private contractors paid by public entities.8    "Electronic citation" means the process of transmitting 9traffic, misdemeanor, ordinance, conservation, or other 10citations and law enforcement data via electronic means to a 11circuit court clerk.12    "Emergency response" means any incident requiring a 13response by a police officer, an ambulance, a firefighter 14carried on the rolls of a regularly constituted fire 15department or fire protection district, a firefighter of a 16volunteer fire department, or a member of a recognized 17not-for-profit rescue or emergency medical service provider. 18"Emergency response" does not include a drug-related emergency 19response.20    "Felony offense" means an offense for which a sentence to 21a term of imprisonment in a penitentiary for one year or more 22is provided.23    "Fine" means a pecuniary punishment for a conviction or 24supervision disposition as ordered by a court of law.25    "Highest classified offense" means the offense in the case 26which carries the most severe potential disposition under   SB2426 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1Article 4.5 of Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections.2    "Major traffic offense" means a traffic offense, as 3defined by paragraph (f) of Supreme Court Rule 501, other than 4a petty offense or business offense.5    "Minor traffic offense" means a traffic offense, as 6defined by paragraph (f) of Supreme Court Rule 501, that is a 7petty offense or business offense.8    "Misdemeanor offense" means any offense for which a 9sentence to a term of imprisonment in other than a 10penitentiary for less than one year may be imposed.11    "Offense" means a violation of any local ordinance or 12penal statute of this State. 13    "Petty offense" means any offense punishable by a fine of 14up to $1,000 and for which a sentence of imprisonment is not an 15authorized disposition. 16    "Service provider costs" means costs incurred as a result 17of services provided by an entity including, but not limited 18to, traffic safety programs, laboratories, ambulance 19companies, and fire departments. "Service provider costs" 20includes conditional amounts under this Act that are 21reimbursements for services provided.22    "Street value" means the amount determined by the court on 23the basis of testimony of law enforcement personnel and the 24defendant as to the amount of drug or materials seized and any 25testimony as may be required by the court as to the current 26street value of the cannabis, controlled substance,   SB2426 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09214 AAS 19271 b1methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer of 2methamphetamine, or methamphetamine manufacturing materials 3seized.4    "Supervision" means a disposition of conditional and 5revocable release without probationary supervision, but under 6the conditions and reporting requirements as are imposed by 7the court, at the successful conclusion of which disposition 8the defendant is discharged and a judgment dismissing the 9charges is entered.10(Source: P.A. 103-620, eff. 1-1-25.)